apertium-kan.kan.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>aAáÁăảạÆbBcCčdDÐeEéèễệfFgGhHiIíjJkKlLmMnNoOóöớpPqQrRsSšştTŢuUúüưvVwWxXyYzZ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
    <sdef n="n"               c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"              c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"           c="Verb, lexical"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"           c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"            c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"           c="'To be' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"         c="'To have' verb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"          c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"          c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"          c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pr"              c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"             c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="ij"              c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adj"             c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="prn"             c="Pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="attr"            c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="top"             c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"             c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"             c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="org"             c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="al"              c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/>

    <sdef n="pers"            c="Personal pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ref"             c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="res"             c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="det"             c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pos"             c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="p1"              c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"              c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"              c="3rd person"/>

    <sdef n="nt"              c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="ut"              c="Utrum"/>
    <sdef n="f"               c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"               c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="un"              c="No gender"/>

    <sdef n="sg"              c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"              c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl"              c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"              c="Singular / plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind"             c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"             c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"             c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"             c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"             c="Genitive"/>

    <sdef n="dem"             c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"             c="Question word / interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"             c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="neg"             c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="emph"            c="Emphatic"/>

    <sdef n="inf"             c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pres"            c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="imp"             c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pret"            c="Preterite"/>
    <sdef n="pp"              c="Perfect participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"            c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"            c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="actv"            c="Active voice"/>

    <sdef n="sint"            c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
    <sdef n="pst"             c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"            c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"             c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="ord"             c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="acr"             c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="unc"             c="Uncountable"/>

    <sdef n="num"             c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent"            c="Sentence end"/>
    <sdef n="cm"              c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"            c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"            c="Dash"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"            c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"            c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"           c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"           c="Right quote"/>

    <sdef n="compound-only-L" c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-R"      c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="ಮನೆ__n">   
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ಗಳು</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ಹವಾಮಾನ__n">     
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ಹುಡುಗ__n">     
      <e><p><l>ನು</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ರು</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ಸಹೋದರ__n">     
      <e><p><l>ನು</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ಯರು</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ತಾಯ__n">     
      <e><p><l>ಿ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ಂದಿರು</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj">     
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="__adv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="__cnjcoo">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ಜೇಮ್ಸ್__np">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ಮೇರಿ__np">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__vaux">
        <e><p><l>ನೆ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ಳೆ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ರೆ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <!-- Define entries within <e> here. -->
    <e lm="ಮನೆ">          <i>ಮನೆ</i><par n="ಮನೆ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ಉದ್ಯಾನ">      <i>ಉದ್ಯಾನ</i><par n="ಮನೆ__n"/></e>   
    <e lm="ಹವಾಮಾನ">      <i>ಹವಾಮಾನ</i><par n="ಹವಾಮಾನ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ಹುಡುಗ">        <i>ಹುಡುಗ</i><par n="ಹುಡುಗ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ಸಹೋದರ">        <i>ಸಹೋದರ</i><par n="ಸಹೋದರ__n"/></e> 
    <e lm="ವರ್ಷ">        <i>ವರ್ಷ</i><par n="ಮನೆ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ನಾಯಿ">        <i>ನಾಯಿ</i><par n="ಮನೆ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ಬೆಕ್ಕು">        <i>ಬೆಕ್ಕು</i><par n="ಮನೆ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ತಾಯಿ">        <i>ತಾಯ</i><par n="ತಾಯ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ಕಿಟಕಿ">          <i>ಕಿಟಕಿ</i><par n="ಮನೆ__n"/></e>

    <e lm="ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು">      <i>ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು</i><par n="ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ತುಂಬಾ">      <i>ತುಂಬಾ</i><par n="ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ಬಿಸಿ">      <i>ಬಿಸಿ</i><par n="ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ದೊಡ್ಡದು">      <i>ದೊಡ್ಡದು</i><par n="ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ಎಲ್ಲಿ">      <i>ಎಲ್ಲಿ</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ಮತ್ತು">      <i>ಮತ್ತು</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ಜೇಮ್ಸ್">     <i>ಜೇಮ್ಸ್</i><par n="ಜೇಮ್ಸ್__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ಮೇರಿ">      <i>ಮೇರಿ</i><par n="ಮೇರಿ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ಇದ್ದಾ">      <i>ಇದ್ದಾ</i><par n="__vaux"/></e>




  </section>

  <section id="final" type="inconditional">
    <e><re>[.\?;:!…¿¶]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    <e><re>,</re>          <p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
  </section>

</dictionary>

<!--
Resources:
    http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Monodix_basics
    http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium_New_Language_Pair_HOWTO#Monolingual_dictionaries
-->
